Utah statutes.
11-38-201.   Quality Growth Commission -- Term of office -- Vacancy --
Organization -- Expenses -- Staff.
(1) (a)  There is created a Quality Growth Commission consisting of:
(i)  the director of the Department of Natural Resources;
(ii)  the commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Food;
(iii)  six elected officials at the local government level, three of whom may
not be residents of a county of the first or second class; and
(iv)  five persons from the profit and nonprofit private sector, two of whom
may not be residents of a county of the first or second class and no more than
three of whom may be from the same political party and one of whom shall be
from the residential construction industry, nominated by the Utah Home
Builders Association, and one of whom shall be from the real estate industry,
nominated by the Utah Association of Realtors.
(b) (i)  The director of the Department of Natural Resources and the
commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Food may not assume their
positions on the commission until:
(A)  after May 1, 2005; and
(B)  the term of the respective predecessor in office, who is a state
government level appointee, expires.
(ii)  The term of a commission member serving on May 1, 2005 as one of the six
elected local officials or five private sector appointees may not be shortened
because of application of the restriction under Subsections (1)(a)(iii) and
(iv) on the number of appointees from counties of the first or second class.
(2) (a)  Each commission member appointed under Subsection (1)(a)(iii) or (iv)
shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.
(b)  The governor shall select three of the six members under Subsection
(1)(a)(iii) from a list of names provided by the Utah League of Cities and
Towns, and shall select the remaining three from a list of names provided by
the Utah Association of Counties.
(c)  Two of the persons appointed under Subsection (1) shall be from the
agricultural community from a list of names provided by Utah farm
organizations.
(3) (a)  The term of office of each member is four years, except that the
governor shall appoint one of the persons at the state government level, three
of the persons at the local government level, and two of the persons under
Subsection (1)(a)(iv) to an initial two-year term.
(b)  No member of the commission may serve more than two consecutive four-year
terms.
(4)  Each mid-term vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same
manner as an appointment under Subsection (2).
(5)  Commission members shall elect a chair from their number and establish
rules for the organization and operation of the commission.
(6) (a)  No member may receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service on the commission.
(b) (i)  A member who is not a government officer or employee may be
reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the member's
official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A member who is a government officer or employee and who does not
receive expenses from the member's agency may be reimbursed for reasonable
expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(c)  A member may decline to be reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in
the performance of the member's official duties.
(d)  A member is not required to give bond for the performance of official
duties.
(7)  Staff services to the commission:
(a)  shall be provided by OPB; and
(b)  may be provided by local entities through the Utah Association of
Counties and the Utah League of Cities and Towns, with funds approved by the
commission from those identified as available to local entities under
Subsection 11-38-203(1)(a).
